Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Article 9. Investments and Loans.
§ 6.2-885.
Investment in stock or securities of controlled subsidiary corporations.

As used in this section and §§

6.2-886

,

6.2-887

, and

6.2-888

:“Control” has the meaning assigned to it in § 2 of the Bank Holding Company Act of 1956 (12 U.S.C. § 1841 et seq.).“Controlled subsidiary corporation” means a corporation that is controlled by a bank organized under the laws of the Commonwealth, or by more than one bank, at least one of which is organized under the laws of the Commonwealth.

A bank may acquire, own, and hold the stock, securities, or obligations of one or more controlled subsidiary corporations. Such investment in stock, securities, or obligations, together with any investment of the bank in stock, securities, or obligations of a bank service corporation, shall not exceed in the aggregate 50 percent of the bank’s capital stock and permanent surplus, without the permission of the Commission, which limit on investment shall not include, but shall be in addition to, investment in (i) a real estate subsidiary as provided in §

6.2-873

, (ii) the stock, securities, or obligations of a building corporation under §

6.2-870

, and (iii) controlled subsidiary corporations that are wholly owned by the bank.

A controlled subsidiary corporation shall not be authorized to (i) receive deposits except as hereafter provided; (ii) engage in the trust business; or (iii) conduct any business that is required under §

13.1-620

to be specifically stated in the articles of incorporation, except a controlled subsidiary corporation may engage in the business of credit card operations, leasing, safe deposit, factoring, credit bureaus, mortgage brokerage or servicing, data processing, international banking and finance, and any other function or business activity in which a bank might engage, except the receipt of deposits, or the trust business. Subject to the foregoing limitations on the businesses that a controlled subsidiary corporation is authorized to conduct, and with the prior approval of the Commission and subject to such conditions as the Commission may impose, a controlled subsidiary corporation may also engage in any business that is authorized by statute, regulation, or official interpretation for a subsidiary of a national bank or an out-of-state state bank as defined in §

6.2-836

to the extent such activity is financial in nature, or incidental or complimentary to a financial activity, and is not otherwise prohibited by state law. A controlled subsidiary corporation transacting business as a real estate brokerage firm shall be governed by §

6.2-888

and be subject to the provisions of this section. A controlled subsidiary corporation may charge and collect such finance charges and fees or interest rates as are authorized to banks by the laws of the Commonwealth or as otherwise authorized by Chapter 3 (§

6.2-300

et seq.).

A controlled subsidiary corporation engaged solely in the business of international banking and finance, and subject to the regulation and supervision by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System, shall not be prohibited from receiving deposits or from taking any other action that any such regulated international banking and finance institution is permitted to take.

The provisions of §

6.2-874

relating to investment of funds in shares of stock of another corporation shall be applicable to controlled subsidiary corporations, except that a controlled subsidiary corporation may acquire, own, and hold stock in a subsidiary corporation if a bank would be permitted to directly acquire, own, or hold the stock hereunder. The provisions of §

6.2-876

relating to loans to officers, directors, or employees of the bank shall be applicable both to loans by the subsidiary to officers, directors, or employees of the bank and to loans by the bank to officers, directors, or employees of the subsidiary, with the approval of the board of directors of the bank only being required for purposes of §

6.2-876

. The limitations of §§

6.2-878

through

6.2-881

as they relate to appraisal value, maximum term, and amortization on loans secured by real estate shall be applicable to controlled subsidiary corporations. Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, the restrictions set out in §§

6.2-874

through

6.2-881

shall not be imposed upon any controlled subsidiary that has no state banks as shareholders.

The provisions of §

6.2-875

relating to limitations upon obligations of any one borrower shall apply to the total obligations of any borrower in the aggregate to the subsidiary corporation and to any bank or bank holding company owning stock securities or obligations of such subsidiary corporation. The loan limit of the subsidiary shall be computed by attributing to the subsidiary a pro rata share of the lending limit of each bank stockholder prorated in accordance with the percentage of stock owned by such bank. However, in the case of a subsidiary, any of the stock, securities, or other obligations of which are owned by a bank holding company, the loan limits of the subsidiary shall be computed by attributing to the subsidiary a pro rata share of the lending limits of all bank subsidiaries of such holding company, which share shall be prorated based on the percentage of stock owned by the holding company and all subsidiary banks thereof. In computing whether a bank or a subsidiary that is not wholly owned is complying with its lending limit, the loans of the bank and the subsidiary to any common borrower shall be aggregated on a basis pro rata to the percentage of stock of the subsidiary owned by the bank. Such controlled subsidiary corporation shall not otherwise be subject to the provisions of this chapter except where it is expressly so provided. Notwithstanding any provisions of this subsection to the contrary, the restrictions set out in §§

6.2-874

through

6.2-881

shall not be imposed upon any controlled subsidiary that has no state banks as shareholders.

History.

1968, c. 270, § 6.1-58.1; 1978, c. 797; 1988, c. 296; 1993, c. 64; 1997, c. 277; 1999, c. 60; 2001, c. 508; 2003, cc. 536, 558; 2010, c. 794.

Law Review.

For survey article on judicial decisions in real estate law from June 1, 2002 through June 1, 2003, see 38 U. Rich. L. Rev. 223 (2003).

§ 6.2-886.
Regulation of controlled subsidiary corporations by Commission.

A controlled subsidiary corporation shall be subject to audit and examination by the Commission whether or not it is an affiliate as defined in §

6.2-899

. The controlled subsidiary corporation shall pay such examination fees as shall be imposed under §

6.2-908

for the examination of trust departments. If upon examination the Commission shall ascertain that the corporation is created or operated in violation of this section or that the manner of operation is detrimental to the business of the parent bank and its depositors, it may order the bank to dispose of all or part of its investment in such corporation upon such terms as the Commission may deem proper.

A controlled subsidiary may not merge or consolidate unless the surviving corporation is itself a controlled subsidiary corporation, or unless as a result of such merger or consolidation the bank divests itself of all stock or other securities that are held pursuant to the authority granted by this section.

The Commission shall have the same powers over controlled subsidiary corporations as it has over banks under §§

6.2-913

,

6.2-915

,

6.2-917

,

6.2-918

, and

6.2-919

, excepting those controlled subsidiary corporations that have no state banks as stockholders.

History.

1968, c. 270, § 6.1-58.1; 1978, c. 797; 1988, c. 296; 1993, c. 64; 1997, c. 277; 1999, c. 60; 2001, c. 508; 2003, cc. 536, 558; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-887.
Insurance business of controlled subsidiary.

In addition to the types of business authorized in §

6.2-885

, a controlled subsidiary corporation that is a domestic or foreign corporation, the majority of the voting stock of which is owned, directly or indirectly, by (i) a bank or banks organized under the laws of the United States, (ii) a bank or banks organized under the laws of the Commonwealth, (iii) a bank or banks organized under the laws of another state, or (iv) a bank holding company owning a bank or banks in the Commonwealth or in another state, may be formed to:

Transact the type of insurance business specified in §

38.2-120

and other insurance normally written under the coverage known as financial institution blanket bonds;

Underwrite insurance indemnifying the bank, its holding companies or its affiliates, and their directors and officers against liability; and

Underwrite reinsurance of mortgage guaranty insurance, subject to such conditions as the Commission may impose, on loans secured by real estate made or purchased by such controlled reinsurance subsidiary’s affiliates or by a bank owning such controlled subsidiary.

Any such controlled subsidiary corporation shall (i) transact only the insurance business specifically permitted by this section and (ii) be subject to the further provisions of Title 38.2 otherwise applicable to insurance companies transacting a comparable business.

The investment of any bank in the stock, services, or other obligations of such a controlled subsidiary shall not exceed two percent of such bank’s capital, surplus, and undivided profits.

History.

1976, c. 340, § 6.1-58.2; 1977, c. 190; 1986, c. 638; 1998, c. 48; 2010, c. 794.

§ 6.2-888.
Real estate brokerage business of controlled subsidiary.

In addition to the types of business authorized in §§

6.2-885

and

6.2-887

, a controlled subsidiary corporation may be formed and licensed to transact business as a real estate brokerage firm in accordance with §

54.1-2106.1

, provided such controlled subsidiary corporation transacts the real estate brokerage business and such services only in accordance with the specific provisions of this section. Such controlled subsidiary corporation shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1 that are otherwise applicable to real estate brokerage companies transacting a comparable business.

A controlled subsidiary corporation of a state bank may own and transact business as a real estate brokerage firm and provide the services of a real estate brokerage firm, only upon the Commission’s determination that the state bank making application to do so is in full compliance with applicable law. The investment of any bank in the stock, securities, or other obligations of a controlled subsidiary corporation shall be approved by the Commission only upon a determination by the Commission that (i) the depositors of the bank are adequately protected from the risk of such ownership and (ii) the ownership is a safe and sound investment for the bank in accordance with applicable law. Such determination shall include but not be limited to providing written notice to the Virginia Real Estate Board and receiving written confirmation from the Virginia Real Estate Board that the real estate brokerage firm, to be owned, and its brokers, are in good standing in accordance with the requirements of Chapter 21 (§

54.1-2100

et seq.) of Title 54.1.

A controlled subsidiary corporation of a state bank may own and transact business as a real estate brokerage firm only in compliance with the following:

The controlled subsidiary corporation, or a state bank that owns a controlled subsidiary corporation, that engages in real estate brokerage, shall not:

Impose a requirement, orally or in writing, that a borrower shall contract for or enter into any other arrangement for real estate services with its affiliated real estate brokerage firm;

Impose a requirement, orally or in writing, that as a condition of approving a loan a borrower shall contract or enter into any other arrangement with its affiliated real estate brokerage firm;

Impose a requirement, orally or in writing, that a real estate brokerage customer shall make application for a loan or any other service or services of a particular bank or any of its subsidiaries, affiliates, or service entities, except as otherwise permitted under the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.) and regulations adopted thereunder;

Impose a requirement, orally or in writing, that a condition of providing real estate brokerage services is that the customer shall make application for a loan or any other arrangement for other services of the bank or any of its subsidiaries, affiliates, or service entities, except as otherwise permitted under the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.) and regulations adopted thereunder;

Offer or provide more favorable consideration, terms, or conditions for any financial products or services to induce or attempt to induce a person to enter into any arrangement for real estate brokerage services with any particular real estate brokerage firm;

Offer or provide more favorable terms or conditions for any real estate brokerage services to induce or attempt to induce a person to apply for a loan or obtain any other services of a particular bank or any of its subsidiaries, affiliates, or service entities;

Conduct real estate brokerage activities in the same areas of a building where the bank routinely accepts retail deposits from the general public;

Conduct real estate brokerage activities in areas of a building that are identified as areas where banking activities occur;

Conduct banking activities in areas of the building that are identified as areas where real estate brokerage activities occur;

Make payment to its employees for any referrals of real estate brokerage business;

Use confidential credit and other financial information available from the bank for solicitation purposes by a real estate brokerage affiliate, without first having obtained the written consent of the customer;

Use or transfer from a bank to any affiliated real estate brokerage firm any financial information of or relating to any unaffiliated competing real estate brokerage firm that is an actual or prospective customer; or

Use, directly or indirectly, nonpublic customer information that is held or obtained by the bank for the purpose of soliciting real estate business, without first having obtained the written consent of the customer;

A state bank that makes a referral to its affiliated real estate brokerage firm shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in writing, in a separate document, to any person who applies for credit related to a real estate transaction or applies for prequalification or preapproval for credit related to a real estate transaction, that the person is not required to consult with, contract for, or enter into an arrangement for real estate brokerage services with its affiliated real estate brokerage firm; and

A real estate brokerage firm that is affiliated with a bank shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in writing, in a separate document, before the time an agency agreement for real estate brokerage services is executed, that the person is not required to apply, contract for, or enter into any other arrangement for services of a particular bank or any of its subsidiaries, affiliates, or service entities.

The requirements of this section are in addition to the requirements of the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act of 1974 (12 U.S.C. § 2601 et seq.) and regulations adopted thereunder.

State banks owning and transacting business as real estate brokerage firms under this section are subject to the provisions of Chapter 9 (§

55.1-900

et seq.) of Title 55.1.

A state bank that acts as a mortgage broker, as defined in §

6.2-1600

, and that transacts business as a real estate brokerage through a controlled subsidiary corporation, is subject to subsection C of §

6.2-1616

; however, a state bank that, pursuant to an executed originating agreement with the Virginia Housing Development Authority, acts or offers to act as an originating agent of the Virginia Housing Development Authority in connection with a mortgage loan shall not be deemed to be acting as a mortgage broker with respect to such mortgage loan but shall be deemed to be acting as a mortgage lender with respect to such mortgage loan, notwithstanding that the Virginia Housing Development Authority is or would be the payee on the note evidencing such mortgage loan and that the Virginia Housing Development Authority provides or would provide the funding of such mortgage loan prior to or at the settlement thereof.

In the event of a violation of this section, the Commission may take such action as is authorized in accordance with §

6.2-946

, including issuance of an order requiring the state bank to cease and desist the activity that violates this section and imposing penalties.

History.

2003, cc. 536, 558, § 6.1-58.3; 2006, c. 422; 2010, c. 794; 2022, cc. 400, 401.

Editor’s note.

To conform to the recodification of Title 55 by Acts 2019, c. 712, effective October 1, 2019, the following substitution was made at the direction of the Virginia Code Commission: substituted “Chapter 9 (§

55.1-900

et seq.) of Title 55.1” for “Chapter 27.2 (§ 55-525.8 et seq.) of Title 55.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 400 and 401 are identical, and inserted “federal” throughout; deleted “subdivision B 5 and” in subsection F preceding “subsection C of §

6.2-1616

”; and made stylistic changes.